incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON K  !!= * @CODE@ is the clitic lexicon, but no clitica here, only #.
# ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 3 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

LEXICON Abbreviation
noperiod ;
ITRAB ;
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ;

! Now splitting according to POS, and according to dot or not
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -

! First collecting POS info, *-noun, *-adv, etc.
! Also splitting when in doubt: -noun-adj => -noun and -adj
! Then pointing to two contlexes, a dot-one and a non-dot-one.

LEXICON ab ! No POS, don't know what pos
ab-nodot ;
ab-dot ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

!LEXICON ab-adj
!ab-nodot-adj ;
!ab-dot-adj ;

!LEXICON ab-adv
!ab-nodot-adv ;
!ab-dot-adv ;

!LEXICON ab-num
!ab-nodot-num ;
!ab-dot-num;

! Here come POS and Case tags, and no period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk
%<n%>%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

LEXICON ab-nodot ! default
%<abbr%>: # ;  ! no period, that is.

! Here come POS and Case tags, with the period added.

LEXICON ab-dot ! Default
%<abbr%>:%. # ;

LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
%<n%>%<abbr%>:%. # ;

! The idea is that the nominal ones may have case, like e.g. P.E.N.


! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------

! The ones without final period are listed first. They do not
! need the transitivity division.

LEXICON noperiod
км² ab-nodot-noun ;
км ab-nodot-noun ;
см ab-nodot-noun ;
гг ab-nodot-noun ;
м3/с ab-nodot-noun ;
кв  ab-nodot-noun ;

! =============================================== !
!            Intransitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

! These give clause boundaries before capital letters
! and numbers, but not elsewhere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB 10 av oss er innflyttere.
! Vi bor i Sth. CLB Saara er også innflytter.
! Vi vet at Sth. er en fin by.


LEXICON ITRAB


в ab ;
г ab ;
гг ab ;


! =============================================== !
!    Transitive number-related abbreviations      !
! =============================================== !

! These ones are transitive when followed by numbers or
! singleton letters, and intransitive elsewhere.
! Gården har Gnr. 10.
! Gården har Gnr. 5. a.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. CLB Det er et problem.
! Alle gårder har ikke Gnr. og det er et problem.

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Apd		ab-dot ;                                      !
Вып ab-dot ;


! =============================================== !
!              Transitive abbreviations           !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON Acronym
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr2-cyr  ;
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr2-lat  ;
                                                                          acros ;

LEXICON acr2-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr3-cyr ;

LEXICON acr3-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr4-cyr    ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acr5-cyr    ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5-cyr
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё|І|Ӧ > acrotag ;
                                                                          acrotag ;

LEXICON acr2-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr3-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr3-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr4-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acr5-lat  ;
                                                            acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5-lat
< A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|S|Š|Z|Ž|T|U|V|W|X|Ü|Ö|Ä > acrotag ;
                                                            acrotag ;



LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ; !Cyrillic letters
cm³ acrotag ; !Latin letters
°C  acrotag ;
K   acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K

LEXICON acrotag
%<n%>%<acr%>: ACRONDELIMITER ;


LEXICON conjunctions

agā:agā CC_   ; !"mutta"
aʼž:aʼž CS_   ; !"jos"
äʼb% ...,% äʼb:äʼb% ...,% äʼb CONJ_   ; !"XX"
bet:bet CC_   ; !"mutta"
ja:ja CC_   ; !"ja"
koks:koks CS_   ; !"XX"
kokska:koks#ka CS_   ; !"XX"
ku:ku CS_   ; !"kun"
ku:ku CS_   ; !"että"
kunā:kunā CS_   ; !"XX"
kuņtš:kuņtš CS_   ; !"kunnes"
kus:kus CS_   ; !"XX"
misjūs:mis#jūs CS_   ; !"XX"
mispierāst:mis#pierāst CS_   ; !"XX"
nemē:nemē CS_   ; !"kuten"
set:set CONJ_   ; !"vaan"
sīest:sīest CS_   ; !"XX"
un:un CC_   ; !"ja"
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON EXCEPTIONS

!! the verbs of negation have partial inflection:
!!€ äʼb
!!€ iʼzt
!!€ aʼlgid
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<sg1%>:äb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<sg1%>:äʼb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<sg3%>:äb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<sg3%>:äʼb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl1%>:äb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl1%>:äʼb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl2%>:ät        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl3%>:äb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl3%>:äʼb        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<sg3%>:iz        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<sg3%>:iʼz        K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<pl2%>:izt       K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<pl2%>:iʼzt       K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<pl3%>:iʼzt       K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<ind%>%<prt%>%<pl3%>:izt       K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<imprt%>%<sg2%>:alā         K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<imprt%>%<pl2%>:aʼlgid      K ;
äb%<v%>%<neg%>%<act%>%<jus%>%<sg3%>:aʼlgõ         K ;

!! Some verbs only have few word-forms left:
!!€ piḑīm
!!€ piḑīks


!! The verb lǟʼdõ has irregular forms:
!!€ lekš
!!€ li
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lǟʼ	INF_dõ	;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lǟʼd	GER_sõ	;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lǟʼ	SUP-STEM_mõ	;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lǟʼ	INDPRS_tõ 	;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lekš    INDPRTSG3-STEM_tõ   ;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lekš        INDPRTPL2_tā   ;
lǟʼdõ%<v%>:lekš        INDPRTPL3_tā   ;

!! The verb vȱlda has irregular forms:
!!€ uʼm
!!€ ūo
vȱlda%<v%>:vȱl   INF_da	;
vȱlda%<v%>:vȯld    GER_sõ  ;
vȱlda%<v%>:vȯʼl     SUP_mõ  ;
vȱlda%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<sg3%>:uʼm     K       ; 
vȱlda%<v%>%<ind%>%<prs%>%<pl3%>:āt     K       ; 
vȱlda%<v%>:vȯʼļ     INDPRTSG3-STEM_tõ   ;
vȱlda%<v%>:ūo        INDPRSPL2_tõ   ;



LEXICON particles

või:või PCLE_   ; !"XX"
laʼz:laʼz PCLE_   ; !"XX"
ku:ku PCLE_   ; !"XX"
kiʼl:kiʼl PCLE_   ; !"kyllä"
agā:agā PCLE_   ; !"-ko/kö"
agā:agā PCLE_   ; !"ehkä"
niʼm:niʼm PCLE-MOD_   ; !"XX"
vȯšiz:vȯšiz PCLE-MOD_   ; !"XX"
võseʼm:võseʼm PCLE-MOD_   ; !"XX"

LEXICON TRAB
досл ab-dot ;
A ab-noun ;
B ab-noun ;
C ab-noun ;
Č ab-noun ;
D ab-noun ;
F ab-noun ;
G ab-noun ;
H ab-noun ;
I ab-noun ;
J ab-noun ;
K ab-noun ;
L ab-noun ;
M ab-noun ;
N ab-noun ;
O ab-noun ;
P ab-noun ;
R ab-noun ;
S ab-noun ;
Š ab-noun ;
Z ab-noun ;
Ž ab-noun ;
T ab-noun ;
U ab-noun ;
V ab-noun ;
Ü ab-noun ;
Ä ab-noun ;
Ö ab-noun ;
a ab-noun ;
b ab-noun ;
c ab-noun ;
č ab-noun ;
d ab-noun ;
f ab-noun ;
g ab-noun ;
h ab-noun ;
i ab-noun ;
j ab-noun ;
k ab-noun ;
l ab-noun ;
m ab-noun ;
n ab-noun ;
o ab-noun ;
p ab-noun ;
r ab-noun ;
s ab-noun ;
š ab-noun ;
z ab-noun ;
ž ab-noun ;
t ab-noun ;
u ab-noun ;
v ab-noun ;
ü ab-noun ;
ä ab-noun ;
ö ab-noun ;
